src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_vanheta_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vanheta - ok: # Verb 'to bring'
     vanheta+V+Inf: vanheta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vanhenen
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vanhenet
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vanhenee
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vanhenemma
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vanhenetta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vanhethaan
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vanhenin
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vanhenit
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vanheni
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vanhenimma
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vanhenitta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vanhethiin
     vanheta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: vanhenu
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: vanhettu
     vanheta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: vanhenheet
     vanheta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vanheneeva
     vanheta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: vanheneevat
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vanhettava
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: vanhettavat
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: vanhenisin
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: vanhenisit
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: vanhenis
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: vanhenisima
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: vanhenisitta
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: vanhettais
     vanheta+V+Pass+Cond: vanhettais
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: vanhene
     vanheta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: vanhekkaa
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: vanhenemassa
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: vanhenemasta
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: vanhenemhaan
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: vanhenemala
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: vanhenematta
